Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 6
RETIREMENT BENEFITS

31-30.5-601. Police officers' old hire pension plans - municipalities under one hundred thousand in population.

In municipalities having a population of less than one hundred thousand and making contributions from general funds into the police officers' old hire pension fund of their respective municipalities, any old hire member of such police department who has reached the age of fifty-five years and who has served for a period of twenty years in any such department in the state of Colorado or who in the alternative has completed twenty-five years in any such department in the state of Colorado, regardless of age, is entitled to a monthly pension equal to one-half the amount of the average salary the member received as a member of said department for one year before the time of granting the member's application. Such payment shall be made regardless of income or earnings that the said retired old hire member receives from any source.

In municipalities having a population of less than one hundred thousand and not making contributions into their respective police officers' old hire pension fund, any old hire member of the police department who has reached the age of sixty years and who has served for a period of twenty years in any such department in the state of Colorado is entitled to a monthly pension equal to one-half of the amount of the average salary the member received as a member of said department for one year before the time of granting the member's application. If, thereafter, such member accepts a salaried position paying a salary of sixty dollars or more per month, the payment of the member's pension shall be suspended during the period the member holds such position.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 879, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

Provisions of this section were formerly numbered as §§ 31-30-314 and 31-30-322.

31-30.5-602. Firefighters' old hire pension plans - municipalities and districts under one hundred thousand in population.

In municipalities, fire protection districts, and county improvement districts having a population of less than one hundred thousand, any old hire member who has reached the age of fifty years and who has served for a period of twenty years of active service in any such department in this state is entitled to a monthly pension equal to one-half the amount of the member's monthly salary as of the date of the member's retirement plus, if the governing body of the municipality, the board of directors of the fire protection district, or the board of the county improvement district authorizes such additional benefits, one-half of any increase in salary and longevity or additional pay based on length of service granted during the period of the member's retirement to the rank occupied by the member in said department. Any old hire member of a paid fire department of a municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district, who has served prior time in a volunteer fire department in any municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district in this state, in the event the member becomes a paid member, may be credited service time at their discretion, at the rate of one year of paid service for each four complete years of volunteer time; except that they shall not receive both a pension under part 11 of article 30 of this title and a service credit under this section.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 880, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 776, § 63, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-408.

31-30.5-603. Police officers' old hire pension plans - municipalities of at least one hundred thousand in population.

In municipalities having a population of at least one hundred thousand, any old hire member of the police department who has attained the age of sixty years is entitled to a monthly pension equal to one-half the amount of the average salary said member received as a member of said department for one year before retirement. Any old hire member of the police department of such municipality having served twenty-five years or more in such police department, other than an old hire member who has arrived at the age of sixty years and retired, is entitled to a monthly pension equal to one-half the amount of the average salary said member received as a member of said department for one year before the time of retirement.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 880, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-610.

31-30.5-604. Firefighters' old hire pension plans - municipalities of at least one hundred thousand in population.

In municipalities having a population of at least one hundred thousand, any old hire member of the fire department who has served at least twenty-five years of active duty and has attained the age of fifty years shall be retired within thirty days after making application for retirement, except during periods of national emergency, and such person shall be paid a monthly pension equal to one-half the amount of the monthly salary said person received as a member of said department as of the date of application for retirement. For so long as the old hire member is in retirement, there shall be added to the amount of the member's pension one-half of any increase in salary and longevity or additional pay based on length of service granted to the rank formerly occupied by the member in the department.

When, for any reason, the rank or grade within a fire department is abolished or ceases to exist and a retired old hire member of such department, on or after April 30, 1963, is in receipt of a pension or annuity from the fund by reason of retirement in such classification, grade, or rank, such member shall receive the member's regular pension payment for the grade or rank occupied at the time of the member's retirement. In addition, such member of a fire department shall receive additional benefits as follows: The fraction which such member's regular pension payment for the grade or rank occupied at the time of the member's retirement bears to the regular pension payment for the next higher rank at such time shall be computed; and such member shall receive one-half of any increase in salary and longevity pay or additional pay based on length of service granted to the next higher rank or grade in such department multiplied by the fraction as above computed; but if the next higher and next lower ranks or grades of the department receive equal money increases, such member shall receive one-half of any increase without multiplication of the fraction above computed. An old hire member of such department who, on July 1, 1969, is in receipt of a pension or annuity from the fund, by reason of retirement in a rank or grade which has been abolished or has ceased to exist, shall have the member's benefits as above described recomputed, and any additional moneys to which the member is entitled shall be paid to the member as if this provision were in effect at the date of the member's application for retirement.

The provisions of this subsection (2) shall apply alike to all those who retired under this section and to those who retire under the provisions of section 31-30.5-705.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 881, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-511.